test/src/older-gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-pimisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - pimisin - ok : # Ordinary VAI verb "eat" -  Wolvengrey p. 396; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kipimisinin
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [pimisin, pimisiniw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: pimisiniyiwa
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nipimisininân
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kipimisininaw, kipimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kipimisininâwâw
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: [pimisinwak, pimisiniwak]

     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-pimisinin, nikîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-pimisinin, kikîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-pimisin, kîpimisin, kî-pimisiniw, kîpimisiniw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-pimisiniyiwa, kîpimisiniyiwa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-pimisininân, nikîpimisininân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-pimisininaw, kikîpimisininaw, kikî-pimisininânaw, kikîpimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-pimisininâwâw, kikîpimisininâwâw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-pimisinwak, kîpimisinwak, kî-pimisiniwak, kîpimisiniwak]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-pimisinin, nikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-pimisinin, kikapimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-pimisin, kapimisin, ka-pimisiniw, kapimisiniw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-pimisiniyiwa, kapimisiniyiwa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-pimisininân, nikapimisininân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-pimisininaw, kikapimisininaw, kikapimisininânaw, kika-pimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-pimisininâwâw, kikapimisininâwâw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-pimisinwak, kapimisinwak, ka-pimisiniwak, kapimisiniwak]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-pimisinin, niwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-pimisinin, kiwîpimisinin]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-pimisin, wîpimisin, wî-pimisiniw, wîpimisiniw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-pimisiniyiwa, wîpimisiniyiwa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-pimisininân, niwîpimisininân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-pimisininaw, kiwîpimisininaw, kiwî-pimisininânaw, kiwîpimisininânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-pimisininâwâw, kiwîpimisininâwâw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-pimisinwak, wîpimisinwak, wî-pimisiniwak, wîpimisiniwak]
     
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-pimisiniyân, êpimisiniyân]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-pimisiniyan, êpimisiniyan]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-pimisit, êpimisit, ê-pimisihk, êpimisihk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-pimisiniyit, êpimisiniyit]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-pimisiniyâhk, êpimisiniyâhk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-pimisiniyahk, êpimisiniyahk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-pimisiniyêk, êpimisiniyêk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-pimisicik, êpimisicik, ê-pimisihkik, êpimisihkik]
         
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-pimisiniyân, êkîpimisiniyân]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-pimisiniyan, êkîpimisiniyan]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-pimisit, êkîpimisit, ê-kî-pimisihk, êkîpimisihk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-pimisiniyit, êkîpimisiniyit]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-pimisiniyâhk, êkîpimisiniyâhk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-pimisiniyahk, êkîpimisiniyahk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-pimisiniyêk, êkîpimisiniyêk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-pimisicik, êkîpimisicik, ê-kî-pimisihkik, êkîpimisihkik]
     
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-pimisiniyân, êwîpimisiniyân]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-pimisiniyan, êwîpimisiniyan]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-pimisit, êwîpimisit, ê-wî-pimisihk, êwîpimisihk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-pimisiniyit, êwîpimisiniyit]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-pimisiniyâhk, êwîpimisiniyâhk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-pimisiniyahk, êwîpimisiniyahk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-pimisiniyêk, êwîpimisiniyêk]
     PV/e+pimisin+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-pimisicik, êwîpimisicik, ê-wî-pimisihkik, êwîpimisihkik]
    
    
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwîwîcipimisinimâw, niwî-wîci-pimisinimâw] # COMM SET I
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimâw, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwîwîcipimisinimânân, niwî-wîci-pimisinimânân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimânaw, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimânaw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimâwâw, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwâw]
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwîwîcipimisinimâwak, niwî-wîci-pimisinimâwak] # COMM SET I-Pl
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimâwak, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwak]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwîwîcipimisinimânânak, niwî-wîci-pimisinimânânak]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimânawak, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimânawak]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimâwâwak, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimâwâwak]

     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimin, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimin] # COMM SET II
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisiniminân, kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminân]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwîwîcipimisiniminâwâw, kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminâwâw]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisiniminân, kiwî-wîci-pimisiniminân]


     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcipimisinimêw, wî-wîci-pimisinimêw] # COMM SET III
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wîwîcipimisinimêwak, wî-wîci-pimisinimêwak]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcipimisinimêyiwa, wî-wîci-pimisinimêyiwa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcipimisinimimêw, wî-wîci-pimisinimimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wîwîcipimisinimimêwak, wî-wîci-pimisinimimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcipimisinimimâwa, niwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwa] # COMM SET IV
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimimâwa, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwîwîcipimisinimimânâna, niwî-wîci-pimisinimimânâna]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimimânawa, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimânawa]
     pimisin+V+AI+Der/Comm+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwîwîcipimisinimimâwâwa, kiwî-wîci-pimisinimimâwâwa]
    
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: pimisiniyâni
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: pimisiniyani
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: [pimisici, pimisihki]
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: pimisiniyici
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: pimisiniyâhki
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [pimisiniyahko, pimisiniyahki]
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: pimisiniyêko
     pimisin+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: [pimisihkwâwi, pimisitwâwi]
     
     


     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: pimisini
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: pimisinitân
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: pimisinik
     
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: pimisinîhkan
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: pimisinîhkahk
     pimisin+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: pimisinîhkêk
